Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.030

Financial interests in transactions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5143-S.SL) ***

(1) No state officer or state employee, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, may be beneficially interested, directly or indirectly, in a contract, sale, lease, purchase, or grant that may be made by, through, or is under the supervision of the officer or employee, in whole or in part, or accept, directly or indirectly, any compensation, gratuity, or reward from any other person beneficially interested in the contract, sale, lease, purchase, or grant.

(2) No state officer or state employee may participate in a transaction involving the state in his or her official capacity with a person of which the officer or employee is an officer, agent, employee, or member, or in which the officer or employee owns a beneficial interest, except that an officer or employee of an institution of higher education or the *Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute may serve as an officer, agent, employee, or member, or on the board of directors, board of trustees, advisory board, or committee or review panel for any nonprofit institute, foundation, or fund-raising entity; and may serve as a member of an advisory board, committee, or review panel for a governmental or other nonprofit entity.

[ 2005 c 106 s 2; 1996 c 213 s 3; 1994 c 154 s 103.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute was abolished by 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 17.